Washington statutes.
RCW 43.380.080

Performance audits.

(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a performance audit of the council every six years.

(2) Each audit must include but not be limited to:

(a) A determination of the extent to which funds expended by the council or provided in biennial budget acts expressly for implementing the duties of the council have contributed toward reducing recidivism in Washington;

(b) A determination of the efficiency and effectiveness of the council, based upon the achievement of the objectives and benchmarks established by this chapter and any applicable biennial budget acts; and

(c) Any recommendations for changes to the council's performance and structure necessary to ensure or improve accountability.

(3) The council may use the audits as the basis for developing changes to its policies and programs.

[ 2016 c 188 s 9.]